Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 3
COLORADO BRAIN
INJURY PROGRAM

26-1-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the Colorado brain injury trust fund board created pursuant to section 26-1-302.

(1.5) (a) "Brain injury" refers to damage to the brain from an internal or external source, including a traumatic injury, that occurs post-birth and is noncongenital, nondegenerative, and nonhereditary, resulting in partial or total functional impairment in one or more areas, including but not limited to attention, memory, reasoning, problem solving, speed of processing, decision-making, learning, perception, sensory impairment, speech and language, motor and physical functioning, or psychosocial behavior.

Documentation of brain injury must be based on adequate medical history. A brain injury must be of sufficient severity to produce partial or total disability.

"Program" means the services provided pursuant to this part 3.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2019.)

"Trust fund" means the Colorado brain injury trust fund created in section 26-1-309.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1604, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1998, § 48, effective May 22.

L. 2009:

IP, (1), and (3) amended, (SB 09-005), ch. 135, p. 587, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2028, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as 26-1-202 in House Bill 02-1281 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

26-1-302. Colorado brain injury trust fund board - creation - powers and duties.

There is created the Colorado brain injury trust fund board in the state department of human services. The brain injury trust fund board is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions under the department.

The board shall be composed of:

The executive director of the state department of human services or the executive director's designee;

The president of a state brain injury association or alliance or the president's designee, who shall be appointed by the executive director of the state department of human services;

The executive director of the department of public health and environment or the executive director's designee;

At least two persons who have experienced a brain injury and at least one family member of a person with a brain injury, which members the governor shall appoint with the consent of the senate; and

No more than seven additional persons with an interest and expertise in the area of brain injury whom the governor shall appoint with the consent of the senate. At a minimum, of the additional seven board members, at least two members must have specific personal or professional experience with traumatic brain injury. The additional board members may include but need not be limited to any combination of the following professions or associations experienced with brain injury:

Physicians with experience and strong interest in the provision of care to persons with brain injuries, including but not limited to neurologists, neuropsychiatrists, physiatrists, or other medical doctors who have direct experience working with persons with brain injuries;

Social workers, nurses, neuropsychologists, or clinical psychologists who have experience working with persons with brain injuries;

Rehabilitation specialists, such as speech pathologists, vocational rehabilitation counselors, occupational therapists, or physical therapists, who have experience working with persons with brain injuries;

Clinical research scientists who have experience evaluating persons with brain injuries;

Civilian or military persons with brain injuries or family members of such persons with brain injuries;

Persons whose expertise involves work with children with brain injuries; or

Persons who have experience and specific interest in the needs of and services for persons with brain injuries.

Board members shall not be compensated for serving on the board, but may be reimbursed for all reasonable expenses related to such members' work for the board.

The terms of appointed board members shall be three years.

No member may serve more than two consecutive terms.

The appointed members of the board shall, to the extent possible, represent rural and urban areas of the state.

The board shall annually elect, by majority vote, a chairperson from among the board members who shall act as the presiding officer of the board.

The board shall promulgate reasonable policies and procedures pertaining to the operation of the trust fund.

The board may contract with entities to provide all or part of the services described in this part 3 for persons with brain injuries.

The board may accept and expend gifts, grants, and donations for operation of the program.

The board shall use trust fund money collected pursuant to sections 30-15-402 (3), 42-4-1307 (10)(c), and 42-4-1701 (4)(e) to provide direct services to persons with brain injuries, and support research and education to increase awareness and understanding of issues and needs related to brain injury.

(8.5) The board may monitor, and, if necessary, implement criteria to ensure that there are no abuses in expenditures, including but not limited to reasonable and equitable provider's fees and services.

Articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S., shall not apply to the promulgation of any policies or procedures authorized by subsection (8) of this section.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1605, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2006:

(9) amended, p. 2016, § 95, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1), (2), and (8) amended, (SB 09-005), ch. 135, p. 587, § 2, effective April 20.

L. 2010:

(8)(d) amended, (HB 10-1347), ch. 258, p. 1159, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1), (2)(b), (2)(c), (2)(d), (4), (8)(b), and (8)(d) amended and (2)(c.5) and (8.5) added, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2029, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3377, § 69, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as 26-1-203 in House Bill 02-1281 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-1-303. Administering entity for services for persons with traumatic brain injuries. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1606, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2019:

Entire section repealed, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2030, § 3, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as 26-1-204 in House Bill 02-1281 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

26-1-304. Services for persons with brain injuries - limitations - covered services.

The board shall determine the percentage of money credited to the trust fund to be spent annually on service coordination and skills training for persons with brain injuries; however, no less than fifty-five percent of the money annually credited to the trust fund pursuant to sections 30-15-402 (3), 42-4-1307 (10)(c), and 42-4-1701 (4)(e) must be used to provide service coordination and skills training to persons with brain injuries.

An individual is not required to exhaust all private funds in order to be eligible for the program. Individuals who have continuing health insurance benefits, including but not limited to medical assistance pursuant to articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5, may access the trust fund for services that are necessary but that are not covered by a health benefit plan, as defined in section 10-16-102 (32), or any other funding source.

Repealed.

All individuals receiving assistance from the trust fund shall receive service coordination and skills training. In addition to service coordination and skills training, the board shall determine any additional services covered by the trust fund. The board may prioritize the services covered by the trust fund and eligibility for the services while ensuring fidelity to the program's original intent to serve individuals with traumatic brain injuries. Covered services do not include institutionalization, hospitalization, or medication.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1607, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1998, § 49, effective May 22.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 480, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 2016, § 96, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-005), ch. 135, p. 589, § 3, effective April 20.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1347), ch. 258, p. 1160, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1266), ch. 217, p. 993, § 66, effective May 13.

L. 2019:

(1) and (2) amended, (3) and (4) repealed, and (5) R&RE, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2030, § 4, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as 26-1-205 in House Bill 02-1281 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

26-1-305. Education about brain injury.

The board shall determine the percentage of money credited to the trust fund spent annually on education related to increasing the understanding of brain injury.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1608, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1998, § 50, effective May 22.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-005), ch. 135, p. 590, § 4, effective April 20; entire section amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1986, § 131, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1347), ch. 258, p. 1160, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2031, § 5, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as 26-1-206 in House Bill 02-1281 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

26-1-306. Research related to treatment of brain injuries - grants.

The board shall determine the percentage of money credited to the trust fund to be spent annually to support research related to the treatment and understanding of brain injuries. The board shall prioritize research related to traumatic brain injuries.

The board shall award grants. Persons interested in a grant shall apply to the board in a manner prescribed by the board. The board may consult with educational institutions or other private institutions within Colorado and nationally regarding the merit of an application for a grant. The board shall determine the time frames and administration of the grant program.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1608, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1998, § 51, effective May 22.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-005), ch. 135, p. 590, § 5, effective April 20.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1347), ch. 258, p. 1160, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2031, § 6, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as 26-1-207 in House Bill 02-1281 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

26-1-307. Administrative costs.

The administrative expenses of the board and the state department are paid from money in the trust fund.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1608, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-005), ch. 135, p. 590, § 6, effective April 20.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2032, § 7, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as 26-1-208 in House Bill 02-1281 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

26-1-308. General fund moneys. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1608, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2019:

Entire section repealed, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2032, § 8, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as 26-1-209 in House Bill 02-1281 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

26-1-309. Trust fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the Colorado brain injury trust fund. The trust fund consists of any money collected from surcharges assessed pursuant to sections 30-15-402 (3), 42-4-1307 (10)(c), and 42-4-1701 (4)(e); gifts, grants, or donations; and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the trust fund. Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the board may expend money in the trust fund for the direct and indirect costs associated with the implementation of this part 3.

The board may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations, from private or public sources for purposes of this part 3. The board shall transmit all money received through gifts, grants, or donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the trust fund.

The trust fund is a continuing trust fund. All interest earned upon money in the trust fund and deposited or invested may be invested in the types of investments authorized in sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the trust fund to the trust fund.

The trust fund revenue and its reserves shall be used solely for the purposes and in the manner described in sections 26-1-304 to 26-1-307.

All unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the trust fund shall remain in the trust fund.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1609, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1999, § 52, effective May 22.

L. 2009:

(1) amended and (4) and (5) added, (SB 09-005), ch. 135, p. 590, § 7, effective April 20.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1347), ch. 258, p. 1160, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2032, § 9, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as 26-1-210 in House Bill 02-1281 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

26-1-310. Reports to the general assembly.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on September 1, 2009, and each September 1 thereafter, the board shall provide a report to the joint budget committee and the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees, on the operations of the trust fund, the money expended, the number of individuals with brain injuries offered services, the research grants awarded and the progress on such grants, and the educational information provided pursuant to this article 1.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1609, § 1, effective July 1, 2003.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2009, § 91, effective May 22.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 2043, § 75, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-005), ch. 135, p. 591, § 8, effective April 20.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-234), ch. 154, p. 521, § 8, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1147), ch. 178, p. 2032, § 10, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as 26-1-211 in House Bill 02-1281 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

26-1-311. Repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1609, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (SB 09-005), ch. 135, p. 591, § 9, effective April 20.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as 26-1-212 in House Bill 02-1281 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

26-1-312. Brain injury support in the criminal justice system task force - duties - membership - report - repeal.

There is created in the state department the brain injury support in the criminal justice system task force, referred to in this section as the "task force". By August 1, 2021, the board shall convene the task force to develop a plan to integrate into the criminal justice system a model to identify and support individuals with a brain injury who are in the criminal justice system. The task force must meet at least four times to develop the plan. At a minimum, the plan must include:

The brain injury training requirements for criminal justice professionals;

The criminal justice professionals who would benefit from brain injury training;

The necessary training required for mental health professionals providing screenings and support to individuals who are in the criminal justice system;

Policies and procedures for performing brain injury screenings for individuals who are in the criminal justice system;

Policies and procedures for supporting individuals who screen positive for a brain injury, including:

Identification of symptoms to determine deficits and appropriate individual support strategies;

Referral to a neuropsychological assessment, if necessary;

Implementation of accommodations, as necessary; and

Referral to appropriate brain injury services outside of the criminal justice system upon the individual's release; and

Identification of necessary contracts between various entities to implement the recommendations in the plan.

The board must appoint the following members to serve on the task force:

The director of the program, or his or her designee;

The director of the division of probation services in the judicial department, or his or her designee;

The executive director of the department of corrections, or his or her designee;

The state public defender, or his or her designee;

The director of the office of community corrections in the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety, or his or her designee;

A sheriff or jail administrator;

A member of the board, or his or her designee;

A member of a criminal justice advocacy organization;

An expert in the research and evaluation of brain injuries in the criminal justice system;

Two members who represent an organization specializing in delivering brain injury services; and

Two members who experienced a brain injury and have been involved in the criminal justice system.

Task force members serve on a voluntary basis without compensation, but are entitled to compensation for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's duties.

By January 1, 2022, the task force shall submit the plan to the judiciary committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees.

This section is repealed, effective June 30, 2024.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-138), ch. 456, p. 3042, § 4, effective July 6.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-138, see section 1 of chapter 456, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.